Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
556

UNIFORM
FIDUCIARIES ACT

Section

556-1 Definition of terms

556-2 Application of payments made to
fiduciaries

556-3 Transfer of negotiable instrument by
fiduciary

556-4 Check drawn by fiduciary payable to third
person

556-5 Check drawn by and payable to fiduciary

556-6 Deposit in name of fiduciary as such

556-7 Deposit in name of principal

556-8 Deposit in fiduciary's personal account

556-9 Deposit in names of two or more trustees

556-10 Cases not provided for in chapter

Note

Uniform prudent management of institutional funds act, see
chapter 517E.

Cross References

Uniform management of institutional funds act, see chapter
517D.

Rules of Court

See Hawaii Probate Rules.

Case Notes

Bank's liability to principal for checks drawn by fiduciary,
discussed. 856 F.2d 78.

Bank not liable to principal where no evidence that bank:
received checks drawn by fiduciary as personal creditor; transferred funds with
actual knowledge of fiduciary's breach of obligation; or transfers in bad
faith. 69 H. 523, 751 P.2d 93.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next